Wisconsin, session 2025, SB453.
do enact as follows:SB453,11Section 1. 8.05 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,2,628.05 (1) (a) When nomination papers are not used, there shall be a caucus to 3nominate candidates. The governing body shall between December 1 November 16 4and January 1 decide the date of the caucus. The date of the caucus may be 5established between January 2 and January 21. When possible, preference should 6be given to having the caucus on January 21.SB453,27Section 2. 8.05 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,2,1488.05 (3) (a) In lieu of sub. (1), the electors either by referendum or at the town 9meeting may provide for nomination of elective town office candidates at a 10nonpartisan primary conducted as provided in sub. (5). The nomination papers 11shall be signed by not less than 20 nor more than 100 electors of the town. The 12nomination papers shall be circulated not sooner than December 1 November 16 13preceding the election and shall be filed with the town clerk not later than 5 p.m. 14the first Tuesday in January, or the next day if Tuesday is a holiday.SB453,315Section 3. 8.05 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,3,2168.05 (4) (a) If a primary is provided for the nomination of candidates for 17elective village offices under s. 8.11 (1m) (b) or (c), candidates for those offices shall 18file nomination papers. In any other case, a majority of the governing body of any 19village may provide that candidates for elective village office shall be nominated by 20nomination papers. Determination of the governing body to provide for nomination 21of candidates by nomination papers shall be made not later than December 1 22November 16 preceding the election. If nomination by nomination papers is not 1provided for under this paragraph and no primary is provided for under s. 8.11 (1m) 2(b) or (c), a village shall nominate candidates by caucus.SB453,43Section 4. 8.05 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,3,848.05 (4) (b) Nomination papers shall be signed by not less than 20 nor more 5than 100 electors of the village. The papers shall be circulated not sooner than 6December 1 November 16 preceding the election and shall be filed with the village 7clerk not later than 5 p.m. the first Tuesday in January, or the next day if Tuesday 8is a holiday.SB453,59Section 5. 8.10 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,4,2108.10 (2) (a) Nomination papers for offices to be filled at the spring election 11may be circulated no sooner than December 1 November 16 preceding the election 12and may be filed no later than 5 p.m. on the first Tuesday in January preceding the 13election, or the next day if Tuesday is a holiday, except as authorized in this 14paragraph. If an incumbent fails to file nomination papers and a declaration of 15candidacy by the time prescribed in this paragraph, all candidates for the office 16held by the incumbent, other than the incumbent, may file nomination papers no 17later than 72 hours after the latest time prescribed in this paragraph. No extension 18of the time for filing nomination papers applies if the incumbent files written 19notification with the filing officer or agency with whom nomination papers are filed 20for the office which the incumbent holds, no later than 5 p.m. on the 2nd Friday 21preceding the latest time prescribed in this paragraph for filing nomination papers, 22that the incumbent is not a candidate for reelection to his or her office, and the 1incumbent does not file nomination papers for that office within the time prescribed 2in this paragraph.SB453,63Section 6. 8.11 (1m) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,4,848.11 (1m) (c) Whenever the electors of a village, equal to at least 10 percent of 5the vote for governor in a village at the last general election, file a petition 6conforming to the requirements of s. 8.40 with the village clerk requesting a 7primary no later than December 1 November 16 preceding the spring election, 8there shall be a primary for any specific election.SB453,79Section 7. 8.50 (4) (f) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,5,2108.50 (4) (f) 1. Except as provided in subds. 2. and 3., a vacancy in the office of 11justice, court of appeals judge or circuit judge occurring in any year after the date of 12the spring election and on or before December 1 November 16 shall be filled, if in 13the office of circuit judge, at the succeeding spring election; if in the office of court of 14appeals judge, at the first succeeding spring election when no other court of appeals 15judge is to be elected from the same court of appeals district; or, if in the office of 16justice, at the first succeeding spring election when no other justice is to be elected. 17A vacancy in the office of justice, court of appeals judge or circuit judge occurring 18after December 1 November 16 and on or before the date of the succeeding spring 19election shall be filled, if in the office of circuit judge, at the 2nd succeeding spring 20election; if in the office of court of appeals judge, at the first spring election, 21beginning with the 2nd succeeding spring election, when no other court of appeals 22judge is to be elected from the same court of appeals district; or, if in the office of 1justice, at the first spring election, beginning with the 2nd succeeding spring 2election, when no other justice is to be elected.SB453,83Section 8. 8.50 (4) (f) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,5,948.50 (4) (f) 2. If a vacancy in the office of justice, court of appeals judge or 5circuit judge occurs after December 1 November 16 and on or before the date of the 6succeeding spring election as the result of the resignation of the incumbent, if an 7election for that seat is scheduled to be held at the succeeding spring election and if 8the incumbent is not a candidate to succeed himself or herself, the vacancy shall be 9filled at the regularly scheduled election.SB453,910Section 9. 11.1111 (1) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,5,121111.1111 (1) (a) 1. The period beginning on December 1 November 16 and 12ending on the date of the spring election.SB453,1013Section 10. 17.21 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,6,31417.21 (3) County clerk, treasurer, and surveyor. In the office of county 15clerk, treasurer, or surveyor, by appointment by the county board for the residue of 16the unexpired term unless a special election is ordered by the county board, in 17which case the person appointed shall serve until his or her successor is elected and 18qualified. The county board may, if a vacancy occurs before June 1 in the year 19preceding expiration of the term of office, order a special election to fill the vacancy. 20If the county board orders a special election during the period beginning on June 1 21and ending on November 30 November 15 of any year, the special election shall be 22held concurrently with the succeeding spring election. If the county board orders a 23special election during the period beginning on December 1 November 16 and 1ending on May 31 of the succeeding year, the special election shall be held on the 2Tuesday after the first Monday in November following the date of the order. A 3person so elected shall serve for the residue of the unexpired term.SB453,114Section 11. 17.21 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,6,18517.21 (5) Supervisors, populous counties. In the office of county 6supervisor of counties having a population of at least 750,000, according to the last 7U.S. census, by election for the residue of the unexpired term on the first Tuesday of 8April next after the vacancy happens, in case it happens no later than December 1 9November 16 preceding the first Tuesday in April, but if the vacancy happens after 10December 1 November 16 preceding the first Tuesday in April, then such successor 11shall be elected on the first Tuesday of April of the next ensuing year; but no 12election to fill a vacancy in the office may be held at the time of holding the regular 13election for such office. In addition to the elections required under this subsection, 14the county executive may order a special election to be held under s. 8.50 to fill the 15vacancy. If an assembly district in the county is altered by legislative redistricting 16effective prior to the end of an existing supervisor term and a vacancy happens, the 17person elected to fill that vacancy for the residue of the unexpired term shall be an 18elector of the assembly district as it existed prior to redistricting.SB453,1219Section 12. 17.245 of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,7,42017.245 New city, village or town office, filling. Whenever an elective 21office is created in a city, village or town pursuant to law or ordinance, the office 22shall not be deemed vacant until it has first been filled by the electorate, except that 23if a city, village or town enacts an ordinance or bylaw creating a municipal court 1under s. 755.01 before the December 1 November 16 preceding the spring election 2the office of municipal judge for that court shall be considered vacant and a 3temporary appointment may be made by the city, village or town governing body 4pending the election of the initial elected occupant of the office.SB453,135Section 13. 17.25 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,7,15617.25 (1) (d) Any town board having more than 3 members may, if a vacancy 7in the office of supervisor occurs before June 1 in the year preceding expiration of 8the term of office, order a special election to fill the vacancy. If the town board 9orders a special election during the period beginning on June 1 and ending on 10November 30 November 15 of any year, the special election shall be held 11concurrently with the succeeding spring election. If the town board orders a special 12election during the period beginning on December 1 November 16 and ending on 13May 31 of the succeeding year, the special election shall be held on the Tuesday 14after the first Monday in November following the date of the order. A person so 15elected shall serve for the residue of the unexpired term.SB453,1416Section 14. 59.10 (3) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB453,8,81759.10 (3) (e) Vacancies. If a vacancy occurs on the board, the board 18chairperson, with the approval of the board, shall appoint a person who is a 19qualified elector and resident of the supervisory district to fill the vacancy. The 20successor shall serve for the unexpired portion of the term to which the person is 21appointed, unless the board orders a special election to fill the vacancy, in which 22case the person appointed shall serve until his or her successor is elected and 23qualified. The board may, if a vacancy occurs before June 1 in the year preceding 1expiration of the term of office, order a special election to fill the vacancy. If the 2board orders a special election during the period beginning on June 1 and ending on 3November 30 November 15 of any year, the special election shall be held 4concurrently with the succeeding spring election. If the board orders a special 5election during the period beginning on December 1 November 16 and ending on 6May 31 of the succeeding year, the special election shall be held on the Tuesday 7after the first Monday in November following the date of the order. A person so 8elected shall serve for the residue of the unexpired term.SB453,8,99